Utah statutes.
59-7-532.   Revenue received by commission -- Deposit with state treasurer -- Distribution or crediting to Education Fund -- Refund claim payments.

(1)  All revenue collected or received by the commission under this chapter shall be deposited daily with the state treasurer.  Such revenue, subject to the refund provisions of this section, shall be periodically distributed or credited to the Education Fund.

(2)  The commission shall from time to time certify to the state auditor the amount of any refund authorized by it, the amount of interest computed on it under the provisions of Section 59-7-533, from whom the tax to be refunded was collected, or by whom it was paid, and such refund claims shall be paid in order out of the funds first accruing to the Education Fund from the provisions of this section.



Amended by Chapter 122, 2007 General Session

